District of Columbia statutes.
7-243

Data system.

The Mayor may establish a single or combined data system to store and share health and human services information; provided, that the system meets the security requirements of HIPAA and that individuals with authority to access the system receive training in accordance with HIPAA prior to any use of the system.

Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 103, 57 DCR 7171
This section is referenced in § 7-242.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 103 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 103 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).